Missouri, session 2026, SB876.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 227, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 227.675, to read as
follows:
227.675. 1. The provisions of this section shall be
known and may be cited as the "Department of Transportation
Fiber Network Expansion Act".
2. For purposes of this section, the following terms
mean:
(1) "Commission", the Missouri highways and
transportation commission;
(2) "Department", the Missouri department of
transportation.
3. The commission may enter into public-private
partnerships with private broadband internet service
providers to expand and further develop the department's
fiber network.
4. The commission shall prioritize expansion and
development under this section in unserved areas and
underserved areas, as such terms are defined in section
620.2450.

SB 876 2
5. The commission shall use a competitive procurement
process to form public-private partnerships under this
section. The commission shall publish a public notice of
the commission's request for proposals, including any
deadline for submission of such proposals, which shall be
published once a week for two consecutive weeks in:
(1) A newspaper of general circulation in the city
where the proposed project is located;
(2) At least one technology industry trade publication
that is nationally distributed; and
(3) Such other publications or manner as the
commission may determine.
6. The commission shall ensure that at least twenty-
five percent of the workforce fulfilling the contracts
awarded under this section belongs to a racial minority
group, as such term is defined in section 37.013.
7. As part of a contract award under this section, the
private partnering entity may use the excess fiber capacity
to provide internet services as long as the services
provided meet the state minimum standard for broadband set
by the department of economic development.
8. The commission may promulgate any rules to
implement the provisions of this section. Any rule or
portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in
this section shall become effective only if it complies with
and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and,
if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with
the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to
delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule
are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of

SB 876 3
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✓